Utah statutes.
41-6a-1117.   Mini-motorcycle restrictions -- Exceptions.

(1)  A person may not operate a mini-motorcycle on any public property, highway, path, or sidewalk unless:

(a)  the mini-motorcycle is registered for highway use in accordance with Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act; and

(b)  the operator is licensed to operate a motorcycle in accordance with Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform Driver License Act.

(2)  An owner may not authorize or knowingly permit a person to operate a mini-motorcycle in violation of this section.

(3)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

